Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1571.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6(b) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 6. Pennsylvania Human Relations Commission.--* * *(b) [Said] The following shall apply:(1) Except as provided under subclause (2), said Commission shall consist of eleven members, to be known as Commissioners, who shall be appointed by the Governor by and with the advice 12345678910111213141516171819202122 and consent of a majority of the members of the Senate, not more than six of such Commissioners to be from the same political party, and each of whom shall hold office for a term of five years or until his successor shall have been duly appointed and qualified.(2) Beginning on or after the effective date of this subclause, the Commission shall consist of eleven members, to be known as Commissioners, who shall be appointed as follows:(i) Two Commissioners shall be appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate.(ii) Two Commissioners shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iii) Two Commissioners shall be appointed by the Majority Leader of the House of Representatives.(iv) Two Commissioners shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(v) One Commissioner shall be appointed by the Attorney General.(vi) One Commissioner shall be appointed by the Auditor General.(vii) One Commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor.(3) No more than six of the Commissioners appointed under subclause (2) shall be from the same political party, and each Commissioner shall hold office for a term of five years.(4) Vacancies occurring in an office of a member of the Commission by expiration of term, death, resignation, removal or for any other reason shall be filled in the manner aforesaid for the balance of that term. Commission members failing to attend meetings for three consecutive months shall forfeit their seats unless the chairperson of the commission receives written 20250HB1571PN1860 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notification from the member involved that the absence was due to personal illness or the death or illness of an immediate family member.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1571PN1860 - 3 - 12345